Nebraska, session 109, LB611.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-6403, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6403 (1) There is hereby created the state building code. The
Legislature hereby adopts by reference:
(a) The International Building Code (IBC), chapter 13 of the 2021
edition, and all but such chapter of the 2018 edition, except section
101.4.3 and chapter 29, published by the International Code Council,
except that (i) section 305.2.3 applies to a facility having twelve or
fewer children and (ii) section 310.4.1 applies to a care facility for
twelve or fewer persons;
(b) The International Residential Code (IRC), chapter 11 of the 2021
edition, and all but such chapter of the 2018 edition, except section
R313 and chapters 25 through 33, published by the International Code
Council;
(c) The International Existing Building Code, 2018 edition, except
section 809, published by the International Code Council; and
(d) The Uniform Plumbing Code, 2018 edition, designated by the
American National Standards Institute as an American National Standard.
(2) The codes adopted by reference in subsection (1) of this section
and the minimum standards for radon resistant new construction adopted
under section 76-3504 shall constitute the state building code except as
amended pursuant to the Building Construction Act or as otherwise
authorized by state law.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6406, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6406 (1)(a) Any county, city, or village may enact, administer,
or enforce a local building or construction code if or as long as such
county, city, or village:
(i) Adopts the state building code; or
(ii) Adopts a building or construction code that conforms generally
with the state building code.
-2-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
(b) If a county, city, or village does not adopt a code as
authorized under subdivision (a) of this subsection within two years
after an update to the state building code, the state building code shall
apply in the county, city, or village, except that such code shall not
apply to construction on a farm or for farm purposes.
(2) A local building or construction code shall be deemed to conform
generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Adopts a special or differing building standard by amending,
modifying, or deleting any portion of the state building code in order to
reduce unnecessary costs of construction, increase safety, durability, or
efficiency, establish best building or construction practices within the
county, city, or village, or address special local conditions within the
county, city, or village;
(b) Adopts any supplement, new edition, appendix, or component or
combination of components of the state building code;
(c) Adopts any of the following:
(i) Chapter 13 of the 2021 edition of the International Building
Code;
(ii) (i) Section 305 or 310 of the 2018 edition of the International
Building Code without the exceptions described in subdivision (1)(a) of
section 71-6403;
(iii) (ii) Section 101.4.3 or any portion of chapter 29 of the 2018
edition of the International Building Code;
(iv) Chapter 11 of the 2021 edition of the International Residential
Code;
(v) (iii) Section R313 or any portion of chapters 25 through 33 of
the 2018 edition of the International Residential Code; or
(vi) (iv) Section 809 of the 2018 edition of the International
Existing Building Code;
(d) Adopts a plumbing code, an electrical code, a fire prevention
code, or any other standard code as authorized under section 14-419,
-3-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
15-905, 18-132, or 23-172;
(e) Adopts a local energy code as authorized under section 81-1618;
or
(f) Adopts minimum standards for radon resistant new construction
which meet the minimum standards adopted under section 76-3504.
(3) A local building or construction code shall not be deemed to
conform generally with the state building code if it:
(a) Includes a prior edition of any component or combination of
components of the state building code; or
(b) Does not include minimum standards for radon resistant new
construction that meet the minimum standards adopted under section
76-3504.
(4) A county, city, or village shall notify the Department of
Environment and Energy if it amends or modifies its local building or
construction code in such a way as to delete any portion of (a) chapter
13 of the 2021 2018 edition of the International Building Code or (b)
chapter 11 of the 2021 2018 edition of the International Residential
Code. The notification shall be made within thirty days after the
adoption of such amendment or modification.
(5) A county, city, or village shall not adopt or enforce a local
building or construction code other than as provided by this section.
(6) A county, city, or village which adopts or enforces a local
building or construction code under this section shall regularly update
its code. For purposes of this section, a code shall be deemed to be
regularly updated if the most recently enacted state building code or a
code that conforms generally with the state building code is adopted by
the county, city, or village within two years after an update to the
state building code.
(7) A county, city, or village may adopt amendments for the proper
administration and enforcement of its local building or construction code
including organization of enforcement, qualifications of staff members,
-4-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
examination of plans, inspections, appeals, permits, and fees. Any
amendment adopted pursuant to this section shall be published separately
from the local building or construction code. Any local building or
construction code adopted under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or the
state building code if applicable under subdivision (1)(b) of this
section shall be the legally applicable code regardless of whether the
county, city, or village has provided for the administration or
enforcement of its local building or construction code under this
subsection.
(8) A county, city, or village which adopts one or more standard
codes as part of its local building or construction code under this
section shall keep at least one copy of each adopted code, or portion
thereof, for use and examination by the public in the office of the clerk
of the county, city, or village prior to the adoption of the code and as
long as such code is in effect.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Building Construction Act,
a public building of any political subdivision shall be built in
accordance with the applicable local building or construction code. Fees,
if any, for services which monitor a builder's application of codes shall
be negotiable between the political subdivisions involved, but such fees
shall not exceed the actual expenses incurred by the county, city, or
village doing the monitoring.
Sec. 3. Section 72-804, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-804 (1) Any new state building shall meet or exceed the
requirements of the 2021 2018 International Energy Conservation Code
published by the International Code Council.
(2) Any new lighting, heating, cooling, ventilating, or water
heating equipment or controls in a state-owned building and any new
building envelope components installed in a state-owned building shall
meet or exceed the requirements of the 2021 2018 International Energy
-5-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
Conservation Code.
(3) The State Building Administrator of the Department of
Administrative Services, in consultation with the Department of
Environment and Energy, may specify:
(a) A more recent edition of the International Energy Conservation
Code;
(b) Additional energy efficiency or renewable energy requirements
for buildings; and
(c) Waivers of specific requirements which are demonstrated through
life-cycle cost analysis to not be in the state's best interest. The
agency receiving the funding shall be required to provide a life-cycle
cost analysis to the State Building Administrator.
Sec. 4. Section 72-805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-805 The 2021 2018 International Energy Conservation Code,
published by the International Code Council, applies to all new buildings
constructed in whole or in part with state funds after the effective date
of this act after July 1, 2020. The Department of Environment and Energy
shall review building plans and specifications necessary to determine
whether a building will meet the requirements of this section. The
department shall provide a copy of its review to the agency receiving
funding. The agency receiving the funding shall verify that the building
as constructed meets or exceeds the code. The verification shall be
provided to the department. The Director of Environment and Energy may,
in consultation with the State Building Administrator of the Department
of Administrative Services, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Section 72-806, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-806 The enforcement provisions of Chapter 1 of the 2021 2018
International Energy Conservation Code, published by the International
-6-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
Code Council, shall not apply to buildings subject to section 72-804.
Sec. 6. Section 81-1608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1608 The Legislature finds that consumers have an expectation
that newly built houses or buildings they buy meet uniform energy
efficiency standards. Therefor, the Legislature finds that there is a
need to adopt the 2021 2018 International Energy Conservation Code,
published by the International Code Council, in order (1) to ensure that
a minimum energy efficiency standard is maintained throughout the state,
(2) to harmonize and clarify energy building code statutory references,
(3) to ensure compliance with the federal Energy Policy Act of 1992, (4)
to increase energy savings for all Nebraska consumers, especially low-
income Nebraskans, (5) to reduce the cost of state programs that provide
assistance to low-income Nebraskans, (6) to reduce the amount of money
expended to import energy, (7) to reduce the growth of energy
consumption, (8) to lessen the need for new power plants, and (9) to
provide training for local code officials and residential and commercial
builders who implement the 2021 2018 International Energy Conservation
Code.
Sec. 7. Section 81-1611, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1611 The Legislature hereby adopts the 2021 2018 International
Energy Conservation Code published by the International Code Council as
the Nebraska Energy Code. The Director of Environment and Energy may
adopt regulations specifying alternative standards for building systems,
techniques, equipment designs, or building materials that shall be deemed
equivalent to the Nebraska Energy Code. Regulations specifying
alternative standards may be deemed equivalent to the Nebraska Energy
Code and may be approved for general or limited use if the use of such
alternative standards would not result in energy consumption greater than
would result from the strict application of the Nebraska Energy Code.
-7-

LB611 LB611
2025 2025
Sec. 8. Section 81-1614, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1614 The Nebraska Energy Code shall apply to all new buildings,
or renovations of or additions to any existing buildings, on which
construction is initiated on or after the effective date of this act July
1, 2020.
Sec. 9. Original sections 81-1608, 81-1611, and 81-1614, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 71-6403, 71-6406, 72-804,
72-805, and 72-806, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-8-